Hawaii statutes.
§560:4-303 Service on foreign
personal representative. (a) Service of process may be made upon the
foreign personal representative by registered or certified mail, addressed to
the foreign personal representative's last reasonably ascertainable address,
requesting a return receipt signed by addressee only. Notice by ordinary first
class mail is sufficient if registered or certified mail service to the
addressee is unavailable. Service may be made upon a foreign personal
representative in the manner in which service could have been made under other
laws of this State on either the foreign personal representative or the
decedent immediately prior to death.

(b) If service is made upon a foreign personal
representative as provided in subsection (a), the foreign personal
representative shall be allowed at least thirty days within which to appear or
respond. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next